Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 6

Agency Contracts and Referral Fees

62-13-601. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agency contract” means a valid written contract authorizing a real estate licensee to act as a party's exclusive agent for the purchase, sale or lease of real estate;

“Agency relationship” means the relationship resulting from an agency contract; and

“Referral fee” means a commission or any other type of compensation for the referral of a potential buyer, seller, lessor or lessee of real estate.

Acts 1999, ch. 160, § 2.

62-13-602. Reasonable cause to solicit referral fee.

Reasonable cause does not exist unless the party seeking the referral fee actually introduced the business to the real estate licensee from whom the referral fee is sought and at least one (1) of the following other conditions exists as between the party seeking the referral fee and the real estate licensee from whom the referral fee is sought:

Sub-agency relationship;

Contractual referral fee relationship; or

Contractual cooperative brokerage relationship.

Acts 1999, ch. 160, § 3.

62-13-603. Unlawful referral solicitation — Unlawful retribution for existence of agency relationship.

It is unlawful for any person or entity to:

Solicit or request a referral fee from a real estate licensee without reasonable cause; or

Threaten to reduce or withhold employee relocation benefits or to take other action adverse to the interests of a client of a real estate licensee because of an agency relationship.

Reasonable cause allows a real estate licensee to solicit or request a referral fee but does not necessarily mean that the licensee has a legal right to be paid a referral fee.

Acts 1999, ch. 160, § 4.

62-13-604. Unlawful interference with agency relationship.

It is unlawful for a real estate licensee, a relocation firm or a firm with a corporate relocation policy or benefits, or anyone on behalf of any such licensee or firm, to counsel a client of another real estate licensee on how to terminate or amend an existing agency contract. Communicating corporate relocation policy or benefits to a transferring employee shall not be considered a violation of this part, as long as the communication does not involve advice or encouragement on how to terminate or amend an existing agency contract.

Acts 1999, ch. 160, § 5.

Chapters 14 — 17

[Reserved]